North Carolina statutes. Chapter 162. Sheriff.
Article 2. Sheriff’s Bond.

§ 162-8.
Bond required.

The sheriff shall furnish a bond payable to the State of North Carolina for the due execution and return of process, the payment of fees and moneys collected, and the faithful execution of his office as sheriff, which shall be conditioned as follows:

The condition of the above obligation is such that, whereas the above bounden
_______________
is elected and appointed sheriff of
_______________
County; if therefore, he shall well and truly execute and due return make of all process and precepts to him directed, and pay and satisfy all fees and sums of money by him received or levied by virtue of any process into the proper office into which the same, by the tenor thereof, ought to be paid, or to the person to whom the same shall be due, his executors, administrators, attorneys, or agents; and in all other things well and truly and faithfully execute the said office of sheriff during his continuance therein, then above obligation to be void; otherwise to remain in full force and effect.

The amount of the bond shall be determined by the board of county commissioners, but shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

History.

1777, c. 118, s. 1, P.R; 1823, c. 1223, P.R; R.C., c. 105, s. 13; 1879, c. 109; Code, s. 2073; 1895, c. 270, ss. 1, 2; 1899, c. 54, s. 52; c. 207, s. 2; 1903, c. 12; Rev., s. 298; C.S., s. 3930; 1943, c. 543; 1983, c. 670, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to statute of limitation on official bond, see

G.S. 1-50

.

As to official bonds generally, see

G.S. 58-72-1

et seq., 162-9 and 162-10.

As to liability and right of action on official bond, see

G.S. 58-76-5

.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Extent of Liability on Sheriff’s Official Bond,” see 12 N.C.L. Rev. 394 (1934).

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2281 (1997).

§ 162-9.
County commissioners to take and approve bonds.

The board of county commissioners in every county shall take and approve the official bond of the sheriffs, which they shall cause to be registered and the original deposited with the clerk of superior court for safekeeping. The bond shall be taken on the first Monday of December next after the election.

History.

1806, c. 699, s. 2, P.R; 1830, c. 5, s. 5; R.C., c. 105, s. 6; 1868, c. 20, s. 32; 1876-7, c. 276, s. 5; Code, ss. 2066, 2068; Rev., s. 2812; C.S., s. 3931; 1983, c. 670, s. 5.

§ 162-10.
Duty of commissioners when bond insufficient.

Whenever the board of county commissioners finds that the sheriff has been unable to provide the bond prescribed by the board, the board shall give written notice to the sheriff to appear before the board within 10 days and provide a sufficient bond. If the sheriff fails to appear or provide a sufficient bond, the sheriff shall forfeit his office, and the commissioners shall elect a suitable person in the county as sheriff for the unexpired term, pursuant to

G.S. 162-5

or

G.S. 162-5

.1, as appropriate.

History.

1879, c. 109, s. 2; Code, s. 2074; Rev., s. 2813; C.S., s. 3932; 1983, c. 670, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to vacancy filled, see

G.S. 162-5

.

As to bonds required of sheriff, see

G.S. 162-8

.

§ 162-11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 670, s. 7.

§ 162-12.
Liability of sureties.

The sureties to a sheriff’s bond shall be liable for all fines and amercements imposed on him, in the same manner as they are liable for other defaults in his official duty.

History.

1829, c. 33; R.C., c. 105, s. 14; Code, s. 2076; Rev., s. 2815; C.S., s. 3934.

Cross References.

As to execution of sheriff’s bonds, see

G.S. 162-8

and notes thereto.